District of Columbia statutes.
7-1601

Definitions.

For the purpose of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“AIDS” means acquired immune deficiency syndrome or any AIDS-related condition.

(2)

“Council” means the Council of the District of Columbia.

(3)

“Director” means the Director of the Department of Health, established by Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1966, effective July 17, 1996.

(3A)

“Domestic partnership” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 32-701(4).

(4)

“Families” means persons who are related by blood, legal custody, marriage, domestic partnership, having a child in common, or who share or have shared for at least 1 year a mutual residence and who maintain or have maintained an intimate relationship rendering the application of this subchapter appropriate.

(5)

“Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

June 10, 1986, D.C. Law 6-121, § 2, 33 DCR 2451
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 18, 55 DCR 6758
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 130(a), 56 DCR 1117
1981 Ed., § 6-2801.
D.C. Law 17-231 added par. (3A); and, in par. (4), substituted “marriage, domestic partnership,” for “marriage,”.
D.C. Law 17-353, in par. (3), substituted “Department of Health, established by Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1966, effective July 17, 1996” for “Department of Human Services, established by Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1979, approved February 21, 1980”.